Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Administrative Code. —

For general provisions: definitions, see 7 AAC 75.990.

Secs. 47.33.910, 47.33.920.
Fees; Regulations. [Repealed, § 49 ch 57 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 47.33.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“activities of daily living” means walking, eating, dressing, bathing, toileting, and transfer between a bed and a chair;

“administrator” means a person who has general administrative charge and oversight of an assisted living home;

“adult” means a person 18 years of age or older who is not a ward of the state under AS

47.10.080(f)

or AS

47.12.120(d)

;

“advocate” means a public or private officer, agency, or organization designated by federal or state statute, or a state plan developed under a federal or state statute, to represent the interests of and speak on behalf of a resident of an assisted living home;

“aging in place” means choosing to remain in a familiar living environment and manage the risks associated with the physical or mental decline that can occur with increasing age;

“assisted living home” means a residential facility to which this chapter applies, as described in AS

47.33.010

;

“assisted living plan” means a written description of

a person’s functional capabilities;

the person’s needs and preferences for assistance with the activities of daily living; and

the services to be provided to meet the person’s reasonable wants and needs;

“health-related services” means services described in AS

47.33.020(c)

— (i);

“home” means an assisted living home;

“imminent danger” means a danger that could reasonably be expected to cause death or serious physical harm to the resident’s self, to the staff of a home, or to others;

“instrumental activities of daily living” means doing laundry, cleaning of living areas, food preparation, managing money and conducting business affairs, using public transportation, writing letters, obtaining appointments, using the telephone, and engaging in recreational or leisure activities;

“person with a developmental disability” has the meaning given in AS

47.80.900

;

“personal assistance” means the provision by an assisted living home of one or more of the following personal services to a resident of the home:

assisting a resident in obtaining supportive services as provided for in the resident’s assisted living plan;

assisting a resident in obtaining instrumental activities of daily living, as provided for in the resident’s assisted living plan;

being aware of a resident’s general whereabouts while the resident is traveling independently in the community;

monitoring a resident’s activities while on the home premises to provide for the resident’s and others’ safety and well-being;

“physician’s statement” means a written statement by a person’s primary physician that includes a

medical history and physical, not older than six months, of the person;

listing of the person’s complete current medicine regimen; and

statement of current therapy regimen necessary to maintain or increase the person’s functioning, mobility, or independence;

“representative” means a guardian, conservator, attorney-in-fact, or other person designated by a court, or in writing by a legally competent person, to act on behalf of that person;

“resident” means an adult who has signed a residential services contract with and resides in an assisted living home;

“retaliation” means an adverse action taken, or threatened, by an assisted living home or an agent of an assisted living home against a resident in response to a complaint made to, or about, the home;

“service coordinator” means a person who is responsible for

coordinating the services of community agencies that provide services to a resident of an assisted living home;

participating in inter-agency case management for a resident; or

planning for the placement of a person in an assisted living home;

“supportive services” means recreational and leisure activities, transportation, social services, legal services, financial management services, educational and vocational services, medical, dental, and other health care services, habilitation or rehabilitation services, respite services, case management, day care, and other services required to meet a resident’s needs;

“terminally ill resident” means an ill resident who has a medical prognosis, certified in writing by the resident’s attending physician, that the life expectancy of the resident is no more than six months if the illness runs its normal course.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1994; am § 50 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 49 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 4 ch 27 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, the paragraphs in this section were renumbered to maintain alphabetical order and to account for the 2005 repeal of former paragraphs (8), (11), and (14). The paragraphs were renumbered again in 2021 to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, repealed paragraphs (8), (11), and (14).

The 2021 amendment, effective November 23, 2021, added (20) [now (17)].

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 27, SLA 2021 (SB 89), amending (17) of this section, see 2021 Senate Journal 293 — 294.